California statutes. Labor Code
(B) The fees associated with the use of the prepaid card shall be disclosed to the employee in writing. The only permissible fees associated with the use of a prepaid card are those for a replacement card provided through expedited delivery, out-of-network ATM fees on the third and subsequent withdrawal per deposit, and fees associated with foreign transactions.

(C) If an employee has consented to use the prepaid card payment system under this section, either the employer or the employee may opt to change the method of payment to another method consistent with this section by providing 30 days’ written notice to the other party.

(D) On or before December 1, 2022, the Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation shall issue a report to the Legislature on payments made to prepaid card accounts. Employers shall provide all necessary aggregated data on their prepaid account programs to the commission upon request. The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) The number of employees who elected to receive their disability indemnity payments in a prepaid card account.

(ii) The cash value
 of the disability benefits sent to prepaid card accounts.

(iii) The number of employees who opted to change the method of payment from a prepaid card account to either a written instrument or electronic deposit.

(E) The report issued pursuant to subparagraph (D) shall comply with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) It is not a violation of this section if either of the following delays occurs in connection with a transaction authorized pursuant to this section, and the delay is caused solely by the application of state or federal banking laws or regulations:

(1) A delay in the negotiation of a written instrument, including a delay in the deposit or electronic deposit of a check to a prepaid card account.

(2) A delay in the deposit of a disability indemnity payment to a prepaid card account.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 63, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   (AB 1239)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 806.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.

(a) A disability indemnity payment shall not be made by any written instrument unless it is immediately negotiable and payable in cash, on demand, without discount, at some established place of business in the state.

(b) This section does not prohibit an employer from depositing the disability indemnity payment in an account in any bank, savings and loan association, or credit union of the employee’s choice in this state, provided the employee has voluntarily authorized the deposit, nor does it prohibit an employer from electronically depositing the disability indemnity payment in an account in any bank, savings and loan association, or credit union that the employee has previously authorized to receive electronic deposits of payroll, unless the employee has
 requested, in writing, that disability indemnity benefits not be electronically deposited in the account.

(c) It is not a violation of this section if a delay in the negotiation of a written instrument is caused solely by the application of state or federal banking laws or regulations.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 63, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 806, Sec. 2.   (AB 1239)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.1.

Where a petition is filed with the appeals board concerning a continuing award of such appeals board, in which it is alleged that the disability has decreased or terminated, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that such temporary disability continues for at least one week following the filing of such petition. In such case, payment for such week shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Sections 4650 and 4651 of this code.

Where the employee has returned to work at or prior to the date of such filing, however, no such presumption shall apply.

Service of a copy of such petition
 on the employee shall be made as provided by Section 5316 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.2.

No petitions filed under Section 4651.1 shall be granted while the injured workman is pursuing a rehabilitation plan under Section 139.5 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.3.

Where a petition is filed with the appeals board pursuant to the provisions of Section 4651.1, and is subsequently denied wholly by the appeals board, the board may determine the amount of attorney’s fees reasonably incurred by the applicant in resisting the petition and may assess such reasonable attorney’s fees as a cost upon the party filing the petition to decrease or terminate the award of the appeals board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1558.)
-------------------------------------------

4652.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 4650.5, no temporary disability indemnity is recoverable for the disability suffered during the first three days after the employee leaves work as a result of the injury unless temporary disability continues for more than 14 days or the employee is hospitalized as an inpatient for treatment required by the injury, in either of which cases temporary disability indemnity shall be payable from the date of disability. For purposes of calculating the waiting period, the day of the injury shall be included unless the employee was paid full wages for that day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 892, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.

If the injury causes temporary total disability, the disability payment is two-thirds of the average weekly earnings during the period of such disability, consideration being given to the ability of the injured employee to compete in an open labor market.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1023.)
-------------------------------------------

4654.

If the injury causes temporary partial disability, the disability payment is two-thirds of the weekly loss in wages during the period of such disability. However, such disability payment shall be reduced by the sum of unemployment compensation benefits and extended duration benefits received by the employee during the period of temporary partial disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1023.)
-------------------------------------------

4655.

If the injury causes temporary disability which is at times total and at times partial, the weekly disability payment during the period of each total or partial disability is in accordance with sections 4653 and 4654 respectively.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.

(a) Aggregate disability payments for a single injury occurring prior to January 1, 1979, causing temporary disability shall not extend for more than 240 compensable weeks within a period of five years from the date of the injury.

(b) Aggregate disability payments for a single injury occurring on or after January 1, 1979, and prior to April 19, 2004, causing temporary partial disability shall not extend for more than 240 compensable weeks within a period of five years from the date of the injury.

(c) (1) Aggregate disability payments for a single injury occurring
 on or after April 19, 2004, causing temporary disability shall not extend for more than 104 compensable weeks within a period of two years from the date of commencement of temporary disability payment.

(2) Aggregate disability payments for a single injury occurring on or after January 1, 2008, causing temporary disability shall not extend for more than 104 compensable weeks within a period of five years from the date of injury.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), for an employee who suffers from the following injuries or conditions, aggregate disability payments for a single injury occurring on or after April 19, 2004, causing temporary disability shall not extend for more than 240 compensable weeks within a period of five years from the date of the injury:

(A) Acute and chronic hepatitis B.

(B) Acute and chronic hepatitis C.

(C) Amputations.

(D) Severe burns.

(E) Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV).

(F) High-velocity eye injuries.

(G) Chemical burns to the eyes.

(H) Pulmonary fibrosis.

(I) Chronic lung disease.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a),
 (b), and (c), for an employee who suffers from an injury or condition defined in Section 3212.1, aggregate disability payments for a single injury occurring on or after January 1, 2023, causing temporary disability shall not extend for more than 240 compensable weeks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 835, Sec. 2.   (SB 1127)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4657.

In case of temporary partial disability the weekly loss in wages shall consist of the difference between the average weekly earnings of the injured employee and the weekly amount which the injured employee will probably be able to earn during the disability, to be determined in view of the nature and extent of the injury. In computing such probable earnings, due regard shall be given to the ability of the injured employee to compete in an open labor market. If evidence of exact loss of earnings is lacking, such weekly loss in wages may be computed from the proportionate loss of physical ability or earning power caused by the injury.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

4658.

(a) For injuries occurring prior to January 1, 1992, if the injury causes permanent disability, the percentage of disability to total disability shall be determined, and the disability payment computed and allowed, according to paragraph (1). However, in no event shall the disability payment allowed be less than the disability payment computed according to paragraph (2).

(1) Column 1—Range
 of percentage 
 of permanent
 disability incurred:Column 2—Number of weeks
 for which two-thirds of
 average weekly earnings
 allowed for each 1 percent
 of permanent disability 
 within percentage range: Under 103 10–19.754 20–29.755 30–49.756 50–69.757 70–99.758The number of weeks for which payments shall be allowed set forth in column 2 above based upon the percentage of permanent disability set forth in column 1 above shall be cumulative, and the number of benefit weeks shall increase with the severity of the disability. The following schedule is illustrative of the computation of the number of benefit weeks:Column 1—
 Percentage
 of permanent
 disability
 incurred:Column 2—

 Cumulative
 number of
 benefit weeks: 5 15.0010 30.2515 50.2520 70.5025 95.5030120.7535150.7540180.7545210.7550241.0055276.0060311.0065346.0070381.2575421.2580461.2585501.2590541.2595581.25 100for life(2) Two-thirds of the average weekly earnings for four weeks for each 1 percent of disability, where, for the purposes of this subdivision, the average weekly earnings shall be taken at not more than seventy-eight dollars and seventy-five cents ($78.75).

(b) This subdivision shall apply to injuries occurring on or after January 1, 1992. If the injury causes permanent disability, the percentage of disability to total disability shall be determined, and the disability payment computed and allowed, according to paragraph (1). However, in no event shall the disability payment allowed be less than the disability payment computed according to paragraph (2).

(1) Column 1—Range
 of percentage 
 of permanent
 disability incurred:Column 2—Number of weeks
 for which two-thirds of
 average weekly earnings
 allowed for each 1 percent
 of permanent disability 
 within percentage range: Under 103 10–19.754 20–24.755 25–29.756 30–49.757 50–69.758 70–99.759The numbers set forth in column 2 above are based upon the percentage of permanent disability set forth in column 1 above and shall be cumulative, and shall increase with the severity of the disability in the manner illustrated in
 subdivision (a).

(2) Two-thirds of the average weekly earnings for four weeks for each 1 percent of disability, where, for the purposes of this subdivision, the average weekly earnings shall be taken at not more than seventy-eight dollars and seventy-five cents ($78.75).

(c) This subdivision shall apply to injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2004. If the injury causes permanent disability, the percentage of disability to total disability shall be determined, and the disability payment computed and allowed as follows:Column 1—Range
 of percentage 
 of permanent
 disability incurred:Column 2—Number of weeks
 for which two-thirds of
 average weekly earnings
 allowed for each 1 percent
 of permanent disability 
 within percentage range: Under 104 10–19.755 20–24.755 25–29.756 30–49.757 50–69.758 70–99.759The numbers set forth in column 2 above are based upon the percentage of permanent disability set forth in column 1 above and shall be cumulative, and shall increase with the severity of the disability in the manner illustrated in subdivision (a).

(d) (1) This subdivision shall apply to injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2005, and as additionally provided in paragraph (4). If the injury causes permanent disability, the percentage of disability to total disability shall be
 determined, and the basic disability payment computed as follows:Column 1—Range
 of percentage 
 of permanent
 disability incurred:Column 2—Number of weeks
 for which two-thirds of
 average weekly earnings
 allowed for each 1 percent
 of permanent disability 
 within percentage range: 0.25–9.75 3 10–14.75 4 15–24.75 5 25–29.75 6 30–49.75 7 50–69.75 8 70–99.7516The numbers set forth in
 column 2 above are based upon the percentage of permanent disability set forth in column 1 above and shall be cumulative, and shall increase with the severity of the disability in the manner illustrated in subdivision (a).

(2) If, within 60 days of a disability becoming permanent and stationary, an employer does not offer the injured employee regular work, modified work, or alternative work, in the form and manner prescribed by the administrative director, for a period of at least 12 months, each disability payment remaining to be paid to the injured employee from the date of the end of the 60-day period shall be paid in accordance with paragraph (1) and increased by 15 percent. This paragraph shall not apply to an employer that employs fewer than 50 employees.

(3) (A) If, within 60 days of a disability becoming permanent and stationary, an employer offers
 the injured employee regular work, modified work, or alternative work, in the form and manner prescribed by the administrative director, for a period of at least 12 months, and regardless of whether the injured employee accepts or rejects the offer, each disability payment remaining to be paid to the injured employee from the date the offer was made shall be paid in accordance with paragraph (1) and decreased by 15 percent.

(B) If the regular work, modified work, or alternative work is terminated by the employer before the end of the period for which disability payments are due the injured employee, the amount of each of the remaining disability payments shall be paid in accordance with paragraph (1) and increased by 15 percent. An employee who voluntarily terminates employment shall not be eligible for payment under this subparagraph. This paragraph shall not apply to an employer that employs fewer than 50 employees.

(4) For compensable claims arising before April 30, 2004, the schedule provided in this subdivision shall not apply to the determination of permanent disabilities when there has been either a comprehensive medical-legal report or a report by a treating physician, indicating the existence of permanent disability, or when the employer is required to provide the notice required by Section 4061 to the injured worker.

(e) This subdivision shall apply to injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2013. If the injury causes permanent disability, the percentage of disability to total disability shall be determined, and the disability payment computed and allowed as follows:Column 1—Range
 of percentage 
 of permanent
 disability incurred:Column 2—Number of weeks for which two-thirds of average weekly earnings allowed for each 1 percent
 of permanent disability 
 within percentage range: 0.25–9.75 3 10–14.75 4 15–24.75 5 25–29.75 6 30–49.75 7 50–69.75 8 70–99.7516(1) The numbers set forth in column 2 above are based upon the percentage of permanent
 disability set forth in column 1 above and shall be cumulative, and shall increase with the severity of the disability in the manner illustrated in subdivision (a).(2) If the permanent disability directly caused by the industrial injury is total, payment shall be made as provided in Section 4659.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 55.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4658.1.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Regular work” means the employee’s usual occupation or the position in which the employee was engaged at the time of injury and that offers wages and compensation equivalent to those paid to the employee at the time of injury, and located within a reasonable commuting distance of the employee’s residence at the time of injury.

(b) “Modified work” means regular work modified
 so that the employee has the ability to perform all the functions of the job and that offers wages and compensation that are at least 85 percent of those paid to the employee at the time of injury, and located within a reasonable commuting distance of the employee’s residence at the time of injury.

(c) “Alternative work” means work that the employee has the ability to perform, that offers wages and compensation that are at least 85 percent of those paid to the employee at the time of injury, and that is located within reasonable commuting distance of the employee’s residence at the time of injury.

(d) For the purpose of determining whether wages and compensation are equivalent to those paid at the time of injury, the wages and compensation for any increase in working hours over the average hours worked at the time of injury shall not be considered.

(e) For the purpose of determining whether wages and compensation are equivalent to those paid at the time of injury, actual wages and compensation shall be determined without regard to the minimums and maximums set forth in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4451).

(f) The condition that regular work, modified work, or alternative work be located within a reasonable distance of the employee’s residence at the time of injury may be waived by the employee. The condition shall be deemed to be waived if the employee accepts the regular work, modified work, or alternative work and does not object to the location within 20 days of being informed of the right to object. The condition shall be conclusively deemed to be satisfied if the offered work is at the same location and the same shift as the employment at the time of injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 34, Sec. 31.   Effective April 19, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4658.5.

(a) This section shall apply to injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2004, and before January 1, 2013.

(b) Except as provided in Section 4658.6, if the injury causes permanent partial disability and the injured employee does not return to work for the employer within 60 days of the termination of temporary disability, the injured employee shall be eligible for a supplemental job displacement benefit in the form of a nontransferable voucher for education-related retraining or skill enhancement, or both, at state-approved or accredited schools, as follows:

(1) Up to four thousand dollars ($4,000) for permanent partial disability awards of less than 15 percent.

(2) Up to six thousand dollars ($6,000) for permanent partial disability awards between 15 and 25 percent.

(3) Up to eight thousand dollars ($8,000) for permanent partial disability awards between 26 and 49 percent.

(4) Up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for permanent partial disability awards between 50 and 99 percent.

(c) The voucher may be used for payment of tuition, fees, books, and other expenses required by the school for retraining or skill enhancement. No more than 10 percent of the voucher moneys may be used for vocational or return-to-work counseling. The administrative director shall adopt regulations governing the form of payment, direct reimbursement to the injured employee upon presentation to the employer of appropriate documentation and
 receipts, and other matters necessary to the proper administration of the supplemental job displacement benefit.

(d) A voucher issued on or after January 1, 2013, shall expire two years after the date the voucher is furnished to the employee or five years after the date of injury, whichever is later. The employee shall not be entitled to payment or reimbursement of any expenses that have not been incurred and submitted with appropriate documentation to the employer prior to the expiration date.

(e) An employer shall not be liable for compensation for injuries incurred by the employee while utilizing the voucher.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 56.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4658.6.

The employer shall not be liable for the supplemental job displacement benefit pursuant to Section 4658.5 if the employer meets either of the following conditions:

(a) Within 30 days of the termination of temporary disability indemnity payments, the employer offers, and the employee rejects, or fails to accept, in the form and manner prescribed by the administrative director, modified work, accommodating the employee’s work restrictions, lasting at least 12 months.

(b) Within 30 days of the termination of temporary disability indemnity payments, the employer offers, and the employee rejects, or fails to accept, in the form and manner prescribed by the administrative director,
 alternative work meeting all of the following conditions:

(1) The employee has the ability to perform the essential functions of the job provided.

(2) The job provided is in a regular position lasting at least 12 months.

(3) The job provided offers wages and compensation that are within 15 percent of those paid to the employee at the time of injury.

(4) The job is located within reasonable commuting distance of the employee’s residence at the time of injury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 57.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4658.7.

(a) This section shall apply to injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2013.

(b) If the injury causes permanent partial disability, the injured employee shall be entitled to a supplemental job displacement benefit as provided in this section unless the employer makes an offer of regular, modified, or alternative work, as defined in Section 4658.1, that meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The offer is made no later than 60 days after receipt by the claims administrator of the first report received from either the primary treating physician, an agreed medical evaluator, or a qualified medical evaluator, in the form created by the administrative director pursuant to
 subdivision (h), finding that the disability from all conditions for which compensation is claimed has become permanent and stationary and that the injury has caused permanent partial disability.

(A) If the employer or claims administrator has provided the physician with a job description of the employee’s regular work, proposed modified work, or proposed alternative work, the physician shall evaluate and describe in the form whether the work capacities and activity restrictions are compatible with the physical requirements set forth in that job description.

(B) The claims administrator shall forward the form to the employer for the purpose of fully informing the employer of work capacities and activity restrictions resulting from the injury that are relevant to potential regular, modified, or alternative work.

(2) The offer is for regular work, modified work, or alternative work lasting at least 12 months.

(c) The supplemental job displacement benefit shall be offered to the employee within 20 days after the expiration of the time for making an offer of regular, modified, or alternative work pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) The supplemental job displacement benefit shall be in the form of a voucher redeemable as provided in this section up to an aggregate of six thousand dollars ($6,000).

(e) The voucher may be applied to any of the following expenses at the choice of the injured employee:

(1) Payment for education-related retraining or skill enhancement, or both, at a California public school or with a provider that is certified
 and on the state’s Eligible Training Provider List (EPTL), as authorized by the federal Workforce Investment Act (P.L. 105-220), including payment of tuition, fees, books, and other expenses required by the school for retraining or skill enhancement.

(2) Payment for occupational licensing or professional certification fees, related examination fees, and examination preparation course fees.

(3) Payment for the services of licensed placement agencies, vocational or return-to-work counseling, and résumé preparation, all up to a combined limit of 10 percent of the amount of the voucher.

(4) Purchase of tools required by a training or educational program in which the employee is enrolled.

(5) Purchase of computer equipment, up to one thousand dollars
 ($1,000).

(6) Up to five hundred dollars ($500) as a miscellaneous expense reimbursement or advance, payable upon request and without need for itemized documentation or accounting. The employee shall not be entitled to any other voucher payment for transportation, travel expenses, telephone or Internet access, clothing or uniforms, or incidental expenses.

(f) The voucher shall expire two years after the date the voucher is furnished to the employee, or five years after the date of injury, whichever is later. The employee shall not be entitled to payment or reimbursement of any expenses that have not been incurred and submitted with appropriate documentation to the employer prior to the expiration date.

(g) Settlement or commutation of a claim for the supplemental job displacement benefit shall not be permitted under
 Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5000) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5100) of Part 3.

(h) The administrative director shall adopt regulations for the administration of this section, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(1) The time, manner, and content of notices of rights under this section.

(2) The form of a mandatory attachment to a medical report to be forwarded to the employer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) for the purpose of fully informing the employer of work capacities and of activity restrictions resulting from the injury that are relevant to potential regular work, modified work, or alternative work.

(i) An employer shall not be liable for compensation for injuries incurred by the employee while
 utilizing the voucher.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 58.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.

(a) If the permanent disability is at least 70 percent, but less than 100 percent, 1.5 percent of the average weekly earnings for each 1 percent of disability in excess of 60 percent is to be paid during the remainder of life, after payment for the maximum number of weeks specified in Section 4658 has been made. For the purposes of this subdivision only, average weekly earnings shall be taken at not more than one hundred seven dollars and sixty-nine cents ($107.69). For injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1994, average weekly wages shall
 not be taken at more than one hundred fifty-seven dollars and sixty-nine cents ($157.69). For injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1995, average weekly wages shall not be taken at more than two hundred seven dollars and sixty-nine cents ($207.69). For injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1996, average weekly wages shall not be taken at more than two hundred fifty-seven dollars and sixty-nine cents ($257.69). For injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2006, average weekly wages shall not be taken at more than five hundred fifteen dollars and thirty-eight cents ($515.38).

(b) If the permanent disability is total, the indemnity based upon the average weekly earnings determined under Section 4453 shall be paid during the remainder of life.

(c) For injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2003, an employee who becomes entitled to receive a life pension or total permanent
 disability indemnity as set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall have that payment increased annually commencing on January 1, 2004, and each January 1 thereafter, by an amount equal to the percentage increase in the “state average weekly wage” as compared to the prior year. For purposes of this subdivision, “state average weekly wage” means the average weekly wage paid by employers to employees covered by unemployment insurance as reported by the United States Department of Labor for California for the 12 months ending March 31 of the calendar year preceding the year in which the injury occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4660.

This section shall only apply to injuries occurring before January 1, 2013.

(a) In determining the percentages of permanent disability, account shall be taken of the nature of the physical injury or disfigurement, the occupation of the injured employee, and his or her age at the time of the injury, consideration being given to an employee’s diminished future earning capacity.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, the “nature of the physical injury or disfigurement” shall incorporate the descriptions and measurements of physical impairments and the corresponding percentages of impairments published in the American Medical Association (AMA) Guides to the Evaluation
 of Permanent Impairment (5th Edition).

(2) For purposes of this section, an employee’s diminished future earning capacity shall be a numeric formula based on empirical data and findings that aggregate the average percentage of long-term loss of income resulting from each type of injury for similarly situated employees. The administrative director shall formulate the adjusted rating schedule based on empirical data and findings from the Evaluation of California’s Permanent Disability Rating Schedule, Interim Report (December 2003), prepared by the RAND Institute for Civil Justice, and upon data from additional empirical studies.

(c) The administrative director shall amend the schedule for the determination of the percentage of permanent disability in accordance with this section at least once every five years. This schedule shall be available for public inspection and, without
 formal introduction in evidence, shall be prima facie evidence of the percentage of permanent disability to be attributed to each injury covered by the schedule.

(d) The schedule shall promote consistency, uniformity, and objectivity. The schedule and any amendment thereto or revision thereof shall apply prospectively and shall apply to and govern only those permanent disabilities that result from compensable injuries received or occurring on and after the effective date of the adoption of the schedule, amendment or revision, as the fact may be. For compensable claims arising before January 1, 2005, the schedule as revised pursuant to changes made in legislation enacted during the 2003–04 Regular and Extraordinary Sessions shall apply to the determination of permanent disabilities when there has been either no comprehensive medical-legal report or no report by a treating physician indicating the existence of permanent disability, or when the
 employer is not required to provide the notice required by Section 4061 to the injured worker.

(e) On or before January 1, 2005, the administrative director shall adopt regulations to implement the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 59.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4660.1.

This section applies to injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2013.

(a) In determining the percentages of permanent partial or permanent total disability, account shall be taken of the nature of the physical injury or disfigurement, the occupation of the injured employee, and the employee’s age at the time of injury.

(b) For purposes of this section, the “nature of the physical injury or disfigurement” shall incorporate the descriptions and measurements of physical impairments and the corresponding percentages of impairments published in the American Medical Association (AMA) Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment (5th Edition) with the employee’s whole person impairment, as provided in the Guides, multiplied
 by an adjustment factor of 1.4.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the impairment ratings for sleep dysfunction, sexual dysfunction, or psychiatric disorder, or any combination thereof, arising out of a compensable physical injury shall not increase. This section does not limit the ability of an injured employee to obtain treatment for sleep dysfunction, sexual dysfunction, or psychiatric disorder, if any, that are a consequence of an industrial injury.

(2) An increased impairment rating for psychiatric disorder is not subject to paragraph (1) if the compensable psychiatric injury resulted from either of the following:

(A) Being a victim of a violent act or direct exposure to a significant violent act within the meaning of Section 3208.3.

(B) A catastrophic injury, including, but not limited to, loss of a limb, paralysis, severe burn, or severe head injury.

(d) The administrative director may formulate a schedule of age and occupational modifiers and may amend the schedule for the determination of the age and occupational modifiers in accordance with this section. The Schedule for Rating Permanent Disabilities pursuant to the American Medical Association (AMA) Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment (5th Edition) and the schedule of age and occupational modifiers shall be available for public inspection and, without formal introduction in evidence, shall be prima facie evidence of the percentage of permanent disability to be attributed to each injury covered by the schedule. Until the schedule of age and occupational modifiers is amended, for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2013, permanent disabilities
 shall be rated using the age and occupational modifiers in the permanent disability rating schedule adopted as of January 1, 2005.

(e) The schedule of age and occupational modifiers shall promote consistency, uniformity, and objectivity.

(f) The schedule of age and occupational modifiers and any amendment thereto or revision thereof shall apply prospectively and shall apply to and govern only those permanent disabilities that result from compensable injuries received or occurring on and after the effective date of the adoption of the schedule, amendment, or revision, as the case may be.

(g) This section does not preclude a finding of permanent total disability in accordance with Section 4662.

(h) In enacting the act adding this section, it is not the
 intent of the Legislature to overrule the holding in Milpitas Unified School District v. Workers’ Comp. Appeals Bd. (Guzman) (2010) 187 Cal.App.4th 808.

(i) The Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation shall conduct a study to compare average loss of earnings for employees who sustained work-related injuries with permanent disability ratings under the schedule, and shall report the results of the study to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature no later than January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 189.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4661.

Where an injury causes both temporary and permanent disability, the injured employee is entitled to compensation for any permanent disability sustained by him in addition to any payment received by such injured employee for temporary disability.

Every computation made pursuant to this section shall be made only with reference to disability resulting from an original injury sustained after this section as amended during the 1949 Regular Session of the Legislature becomes effective; provided, however, that all rights presently existing under this section shall be continued in force.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

4661.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, when any temporary total disability indemnity payment is made two years or more from the date of injury, the amount of this payment shall be computed in accordance with the temporary disability indemnity average weekly earnings amount specified in Section 4453 in effect on the date each temporary total disability payment is made unless computing the payment on this basis produces a lower payment because of a reduction in the minimum average weekly earnings applicable under Section 4453.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 892, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

4662.

(a) Any of the following permanent disabilities shall be conclusively presumed to be total in character:

(1) Loss of both eyes or the sight thereof.

(2) Loss of both hands or the use thereof.

(3) An injury resulting in a practically total paralysis.

(4) An injury to the brain resulting in permanent mental incapacity.

(b) In all other cases, permanent total disability shall be determined in accordance with the fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 46.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4663.

(a) Apportionment of permanent disability shall be based on causation.

(b) A physician who prepares a report addressing the issue of permanent disability due to a claimed industrial injury shall address in that report the issue of causation of the permanent disability.

(c) In order for a physician’s report to be considered complete on the issue of permanent disability, the report must include an apportionment determination. A physician shall make an apportionment determination by finding what approximate percentage of the permanent disability was caused by the direct result of injury arising out of and occurring in the course of employment and what approximate